Oklahoma, session 2026, SB872.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 509 of Title 19, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Any county sheriff is authorized to work in conjunction with the


United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement and the United


States Customs and Border Protection to detain undocumented


immigrants.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-742 CN 1/19/2025 5:45:00 AM







Req. No. 742 Page 1